Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 2. Virginia Nuclear Energy Consortium Authority.

§ 45.2-2102.
Virginia Nuclear Energy Consortium Authority established.

There is hereby established a political subdivision of the Commonwealth known as the Virginia Nuclear Energy Consortium Authority. The Authority’s exercise of powers conferred by this article shall be deemed to be the performance of an essential governmental function and matters of public necessity for which public moneys may be spent and private property acquired.

History.

2013, cc. 57, 394, § 67-1401; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.

§ 45.2-2103.
Purposes; powers of Authority.

The Authority is established for the purposes of making the Commonwealth a national and global leader in nuclear energy and serving as an interdisciplinary study, research, and information resource for the Commonwealth on nuclear energy issues.

The Authority is granted all powers necessary or convenient for the carrying out of its statutory purposes, including the following rights, powers, and duties to:

Adopt, use, and alter at will a corporate seal;

Acquire, purchase, hold, use, lease, or otherwise dispose of property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein necessary or desirable for carrying out the purposes of the Authority;

Adopt bylaws for the management and regulation of its affairs;

Develop and adopt a strategic plan for carrying out the purposes set out in this article;

Make and enter into any contract or agreement necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties, the furtherance of its purposes, and the execution of its powers under this article, including an agreement with any person or federal agency;

Consult with the General Assembly; federal, state, and local agencies; nonprofit organizations; private industry; and other potential developers and users of nuclear energy;

Promote and facilitate agreements among public and private institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth and other research entities to carry out research projects relating to nuclear energy;

Disseminate information and research results;

Identify and support, in cooperation with Virginia’s nuclear entities and the public and private sectors, the development of education programs related to Virginia’s nuclear industry;

Provide for the establishment of the Consortium by the Board as provided in §

45.2-2105

;

Develop a policy regarding any interest in intellectual property acquired or developed by the Consortium;

In order to fund and support the activities of the Authority and the Consortium, apply for, solicit, and accept from any source, including any agency of the federal government, the Commonwealth, or any other state; any locality or other political subdivision; any member; or any private corporation or other entity, (i) grants, including grants made available pursuant to federal legislation; (ii) aid; or (iii) contributions of money, property, or other things of value, which shall be held, used, and applied for the purposes set out by this chapter;

Facilitate the collaboration of members toward obtaining grants and expending funds in accomplishing the purposes set out by this chapter;

Encourage, facilitate, and support the application, commercialization, and transfer of new nuclear energy technologies;

Provide public information and communication about nuclear energy and related educational and job opportunities;

Provide advice, assistance, and services to institutions of higher education and to other persons providing services or facilities for nuclear research or graduate education;

Foster innovative partnerships and relationships among the Commonwealth, the Commonwealth’s public institutions of higher education, private companies, federal laboratories, and not-for-profit organizations to accomplish the purposes set out by this chapter; and

Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers granted to it by law.

History.

2013, cc. 57, 394, § 67-1402; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.

§ 45.2-2104.
Board of the Authority.

The Authority shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of 17 members appointed as follows:

The Director or his designee;

The President and Chief Executive Officer of the Virginia Economic Development Partnership or his designee;

The Chancellor of the Virginia Community College System or his designee;

The President of Virginia Commonwealth University or his designee;

The President of the University of Virginia or his designee;

The President of Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University or his designee;

The President of George Mason University or his designee;

Two individuals, each representing a single institution of higher education in the Commonwealth that is not already represented on the Board. At least one of the institutions shall be a private institution of higher education;

Six individuals, each representing a single business entity located in the Commonwealth that is engaged in activities directly related to the nuclear energy industry;

One individual representing a nuclear energy-related nonprofit organization; and

One individual representing a Commonwealth-based federal research laboratory.

The members of the Board described in subdivisions A 1 through 7 shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office.

The 10 members of the Board described in subdivisions A 8 through 11 shall be appointed by the Governor. After the initial staggering of terms, such members shall be appointed for terms of four years. Vacancies in the membership of the Board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments for the unexpired portion of the term. Members of the Board described in subdivisions A 8 through 11 may serve two successive terms on the Board.

Any appointment to fill a vacancy on the Board shall be made for the unexpired term of the member whose death, resignation, or removal created the vacancy.

Meetings of the Board shall be held at the call of the chairman or any seven members. Nine members of the Board constitute a quorum for the transaction of the business of the Authority. An act of the majority of the members of the Board present at any regular or special meeting at which a quorum is present is an act of the Board.

Immediately after appointment, the members of the Board shall enter upon the performance of their duties.

The Board shall annually elect from among its members a chairman, a vice-chairman, and a treasurer. The Board shall also elect annually a secretary, who need not be a member of the Board, and may also elect such other subordinate officers, who need not be members of the Board, as it deems proper. The chairman, or in his absence the vice-chairman, shall preside at each meeting of the Board. In the absence of both the chairman and vice-chairman, the Board shall appoint a chairman pro tempore who shall preside at such meeting.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, no officer or employee of the Commonwealth shall be deemed to have forfeited or shall forfeit his office or employment by reason of acceptance of membership on the Board or by providing service to the Authority or to the Consortium.

On or before November 15 of each year, the Authority shall submit its updated strategic plan, an annual summary of its activities, and recommendations for the support and expansion of the nuclear energy industry in Virginia to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor.

History.

2013, cc. 57, 394, § 67-1403; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532 amended former § 67-1403 from which this section is derived. Since the department name was deleted by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, the amendment by c. 532 was not given effect.

§ 45.2-2105.
Establishment of the Consortium.

The Board shall provide for the formation, by January 1, 2014, of a nonstock corporation under Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1, not organized for profit, that shall include in its name the words “Virginia Nuclear Energy Consortium” or some variation thereof that is approved by the Board.

The Consortium shall be established for the purpose of conducting activities useful in (i) making the Commonwealth a leader in nuclear energy; (ii) serving as an interdisciplinary study, research, and information resource for the Commonwealth on nuclear energy issues; and (iii) carrying out the provisions of this article, including raising money on behalf of the Authority in the corporate and nonprofit community and from other nonstate sources.

The membership of the Consortium shall be open to:

Public or private institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth;

Commonwealth-based federal research laboratories;

Nuclear energy-related nonprofit organizations;

Business entities with operating facilities located in the Commonwealth that are engaged in activities directly related to the nuclear energy industry; and

Other individuals or entities whose membership is approved by the board of directors of the Consortium through a process established by the bylaws of the Consortium.

The board of directors of the Consortium shall consist of members selected and approved by the Consortium pursuant to a process established by its bylaws.

The board of directors of the Consortium shall appoint an executive director to serve as the principal administrative officer of the Consortium. The executive director shall carry out the specific duties assigned to him by the board of directors and develop appropriate policies and procedures for the operation of the Consortium; employ persons and secure services as required to carry out the purposes of the Consortium; expend funds as authorized by the Authority; and accept moneys from federal or private sources on behalf of the Authority, including moneys contributed by Consortium members to the Authority, for cost-sharing on nuclear energy research or projects. The executive director and any other employee of the Consortium (i) shall be compensated in the manner provided by the board of directors of the Authority, (ii) shall not be subject to the provisions of the Virginia Personnel Act (§

2.2-2900

et seq.), and (iii) shall not be deemed to be an officer or employee for purposes of the State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act (§

2.2-3100

et seq.).

The articles of incorporation of the Consortium shall provide that upon dissolution the net assets of the Consortium shall be transferred to the Authority.

The Consortium shall not be deemed to be a state or governmental agency, advisory agency, public body, or agency or instrumentality for purposes of Chapter 8 (§

2.2-800

et seq.), 18 (§

2.2-1800

et seq.), 24 (§

2.2-2400

et seq.), 29 (§

2.2-2900

et seq.), 31 (§

2.2-3100

et seq.), 37 (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), 38 (§

2.2-3800

et seq.), 43 (§

2.2-4300

et seq.), 44 (§

2.2-4400

et seq.), 45 (§

2.2-4500

et seq.), 46 (§

2.2-4600

et seq.), or 47 (§

2.2-4700

et seq.) of Title 2.2, Chapter 14 (§ 30-130 et seq.) of Title 30, or Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.) of Title 51.1.

The board of directors of the Consortium shall adopt, alter, and repeal bylaws governing the manner in which its business shall be transacted and the manner in which the activities of the Consortium shall be conducted.

The Consortium shall report on all of its nonproprietary activities at least twice a year to the Authority.

History.

2013, cc. 57, 394, § 67-1404; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.

§ 45.2-2106.
Moneys of Authority.

All moneys of the Authority, from whatever source derived, shall be paid to the treasurer of the Authority. Such moneys shall be deposited in the first instance by the treasurer in one or more banks or trust companies, in one or more special accounts. All banks and trust companies are authorized to give such security for such deposits, if required by the Authority. The moneys in such accounts shall be paid out on the warrant or other orders of such persons as the Authority authorizes to execute such warrants or orders.

History.

2013, cc. 57, 394, § 67-1405; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.

§ 45.2-2107.
Audits; external reviews.

The Auditor of Public Accounts, or his legally authorized representatives, shall annually audit the financial accounts of the Authority. The audit report and any nonproprietary information provided to the auditor in connection with the audit shall be made available to the public, upon request, in accordance with the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

The Authority, if it receives state funds, shall be subject to periodic external review either (i) under the provisions of the Legislative Program Review and Evaluation Act (§ 30-64 et seq.) or (ii) by an entity appointed for that purpose by the Governor.

History.

2013, cc. 57, 394, § 67-1406; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.